Utah, session 2026, HB74.
Section 1. Section 20A-1-102 is amended to read:20A-1-102. Definitions.As used in this title:(1)"Active voter" means a registered voter who has not been classified as an inactive voter by the county clerk.(2)"Automatic tabulating equipment" means apparatus that automatically examines and counts votes recorded on ballots and tabulates the results.(3)(a)"Ballot" means the storage medium, including a paper, mechanical, or electronic storage medium, that records an individual voter's vote.(b)"Ballot" does not include a record to tally multiple votes.(4)"Ballot proposition" means a question, issue, or proposal that is submitted to voters on the ballot for their approval or rejection including:(a)an opinion question specifically authorized by the Legislature;(b)a constitutional amendment;(c)an initiative;(d)a referendum;(e)a bond proposition;(f)a judicial retention question;(g)an incorporation of a city or town; or(h)any other ballot question specifically authorized by the Legislature.(5)"Bind," "binding," or "bound" means securing more than one piece of paper together using staples, a spiral binder, or another means in at least three places across the top of the paper in the blank space reserved for securing the paper.(6)"Board of canvassers" means the entities established by Sections 20A-4-301 and 20A-4-306 to canvass election returns.(7)"Bond election" means an election held for the purpose of approving or rejecting the proposed issuance of bonds by a government entity.(8)"Business day" means a Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday that is not a holiday.(9)"Business reply mail envelope" means an envelope that may be mailed free of charge by the sender.(10)"Calendar day" means any day, regardless of whether the day is a weekend, a holiday, a business day, or any other type of day.(11)"Canvass" means the review of election returns and the official declaration of election results by the board of canvassers.(12)"Canvassing judge" means a poll worker designated to assist in counting ballots at the canvass.(13)"Contracting election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a provider election officer.(14)"Convention" means the political party convention at which party officers and delegates are selected.(15)"Counting center" means one or more locations selected by the election officer in charge of the election for the automatic counting of ballots.(16)"Counting judge" means a poll worker designated to count the ballots during election day.(17)"Counting room" means a suitable and convenient private place or room for use by the poll workers and counting judges to count ballots.(18)"County officers" means those county officers that are required by law to be elected.(19)"Date of the election" or "election day" or "day of the election":(a)means the day that is specified in the calendar year as the day on which the election occurs; and(b)does not include:(i)deadlines established for voting by mail, military-overseas voting, or emergency voting; or(ii)any early voting or early voting period as provided under Chapter 3a, Part 6, Early Voting.(20)"Elected official" means:(a)a person elected to an office under Section 20A-1-303 or Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project;(b)a person who is considered to be elected to a municipal office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(1)(c)(ii); or(c)a person who is considered to be elected to a special district office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(3)(b)(ii).(21)"Election" means a regular general election, a municipal general election, a statewide special election, a local special election, a regular primary election, a municipal primary election, and a special district election.(22)"Election Assistance Commission" means the commission established by the Help America Vote Act of 2002, Pub. L. No. 107-252.(23)"Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day on which individuals are eligible to file declarations of candidacy and ending when the canvass is completed.(24)"Election judge" means a poll worker that is assigned to:(a)preside over other poll workers at a polling place;(b)act as the presiding election judge; or(c)serve as a canvassing judge, counting judge, or receiving judge.(25)"Election material" includes:(a)the verification documentation described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(9)(b)(iv);(b)the list of voters contacted to cure a ballot described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(10)(b);(c)the record of rejected and resolved ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(11)(a);(d)any chain of custody documentation described in Section 20A-3a-401.1, including:(i)the count of ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(3); and(ii)the batch log described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(5);(e)the record of signature verification audits described in Subsection 20A-3a-402.5(4);(f)the affidavit of compliance described in Subsection 20A-3a-404(2);(g)the physical and electronic log of replicated ballots described in Subsection 20A-4-104(3);(h)the physical or electronic log of adjudicated ballots described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(i)the record of voter database access described in Subsection 20A-5-905(2);(j)the reports on military and overseas voters described in Section 20A-16-202;(k)scanned copies of return envelopes;(l)a copy of the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5; and(m)the materials used in the programming of the automatic tabulating equipment.(26)"Election officer" means:(a)the lieutenant governor, for all statewide ballots and elections;(b)the county clerk for:(i)a county ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(c)the municipal clerk for:(i)a municipal ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(d)the special district clerk or chief executive officer for:(i)a special district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5; or(e)the business administrator or superintendent of a school district for:(i)a school district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5.(27)"Election official" means any election officer, election judge, or poll worker.(28)"Election results" means:(a)for an election other than a bond election, the count of votes cast in the election and the election returns requested by the board of canvassers; or(b)for bond elections, the count of those votes cast for and against the bond proposition plus any or all of the election returns that the board of canvassers may request.(29)"Election results database" means the following information generated by voting equipment:(a)one or more electronic files that contains a digital interpretation of each ballot that is counted in an election;(b)a ballot image; and(c)other information related to a ballot that is adjudicated under Section 20A-4-105.(30)"Election returns" means:(a)the pollbook;(b)the military and overseas absentee voter registration and voting certificates;(c)one of the tally sheets;(d)any unprocessed ballots;(e)all counted ballots;(f)all excess ballots;(g)all unused ballots;(h)all spoiled ballots;(i)all ballot disposition forms, including any provisional ballot disposition forms;(j)the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(k)all return envelopes;(l)any provisional ballot envelopes; and(m)the total votes cast form.(31)"Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.(32)"Holiday" means a legal holiday described in Subsections 63G-1-301(1) and (2).(33)"Inactive voter" means a registered voter who is listed as inactive by a county clerk under Subsection 20A-2-505(4)(c)(i) or (ii).(34)"Judicial office" means the office filled by any judicial officer.(35)"Judicial officer" means any justice or judge of a court of record or any county court judge.(36)"Local election" means a regular county election, a regular municipal election, a municipal primary election, a local special election, a special district election, and a bond election.(37)"Local political subdivision" means a county, a municipality, a special district, or a local school district.(38)"Local special election" means a special election called by the governing body of a local political subdivision in which all registered voters of the local political subdivision may vote.(39)"Manual ballot" means a paper document produced by an election officer on which an individual records an individual's vote by directly placing a mark on the paper document using a pen or other marking instrument.(40)"Mechanical ballot" means a record, including a paper record, electronic record, or mechanical record, that:(a)is created via electronic or mechanical means; and(b)records an individual voter's vote cast via a method other than an individual directly placing a mark, using a pen or other marking instrument, to record an individual voter's vote.(41)"Municipal executive" means:(a)the mayor in the council-mayor form of government defined in Section 10-3b-102; or(b)the mayor in the council-manager form of government defined in Subsection 10-3b-103(6).(42)"Municipal general election" means the election held in municipalities and, as applicable, special districts on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-202.(43)"Municipal legislative body" means the council of the city or town in any form of municipal government.(44)"Municipal office" means an elective office in a municipality.(45)"Municipal officers" means those municipal officers that are required by law to be elected.(46)"Municipal primary election" means an election held to nominate candidates for municipal office.(47)"Municipality" means a city or town.(48)"Official ballot" means the ballots distributed by the election officer for voters to record their votes.(49)"Official endorsement" means  the information on the ballot that identifies:(a)the ballot as an official ballot;(b)the date of the election; and(c)(i)for a ballot prepared by an election officer other than a county clerk, the facsimile signature required by Subsection 20A-6-401(1)(a)(iii); or(ii)for a ballot prepared by a county clerk, the words required by Subsection 20A-6-301(1)(b)(iii).(50)"Official register" means the official record furnished to election officials by the election officer that contains the information required by Section 20A-5-401.(51)"Political party" means an organization of registered voters that has qualified to participate in an election by meeting the requirements of Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures.(52)(a)"Poll worker" means a person assigned by an election official to assist with an election, voting, or counting votes.(b)"Poll worker" includes election judges.(c)"Poll worker" does not include a watcher.(53)"Pollbook" means a record of the names of voters in the order that the voters appear to cast votes.(54)"Polling place" means a building where voting is conducted.(55)"Position" means a square, circle, rectangle, or other geometric shape on a ballot in which the voter marks the voter's choice.(56)"Presidential Primary Election" means the election established in Chapter 9, Part 8, Presidential Primary Election.(57)"Primary convention" means the political party conventions held during the year of the regular general election.(58)"Protective counter" means a separate counter, which cannot be reset, that:(a)is built into a voting machine; and(b)records the total number of movements of the operating lever.(59)"Provider election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a contracting election officer to conduct an election for the contracting election officer's local political subdivision in accordance with Section 20A-5-400.1.(60)"Provisional ballot" means a ballot voted provisionally by a person:(a)whose name is not listed on the official register at the polling place;(b)whose legal right to vote is challenged as provided in this title; or(c)whose identity was not sufficiently established by a poll worker.(61)"Provisional ballot envelope" means an envelope printed in the form required by Section 20A-6-105 that is used to identify provisional ballots and to provide information to verify a person's legal right to vote.(62)(a)"Public figure" means an individual who, due to the individual being considered for, holding, or having held a position of prominence in a public or private capacity, or due to the individual's celebrity status, has an increased risk to the individual's safety.(b)"Public figure" does not include an individual:(i)elected to public office; or(ii)appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected public office.(63)"Qualify" or "qualified" means to take the oath of office and begin performing the duties of the position for which the individual was elected.(64)"Receiving judge" means the poll worker that checks the voter's name in the official register at a polling place and provides the voter with a ballot.(65)"Registration form" means a form by which an individual may register to vote under this title.(66)"Regular ballot" means a ballot that is not a provisional ballot.(67)"Regular general election" means the election held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-201.(68)"Regular primary election" means the election, held on the date specified in Section 20A-1-201.5, to nominate candidates of political parties and candidates for nonpartisan local school board positions to advance to the regular general election.(69)"Resident" means a person who resides within a specific voting precinct in Utah.(70)"Return envelope" means the envelope, described in Subsection 20A-3a-202(4), provided to a voter with a manual ballot:(a)into which the voter places the manual ballot after the voter has voted the manual ballot in order to preserve the secrecy of the voter's vote; and(b)that includes the voter affidavit and a place for the voter's signature.(71)"Sample ballot" means a mock ballot similar in form to the official ballot, published as provided in Section 20A-5-405.(72)"Special district" means a local government entity under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts, and includes a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.(73)"Special district officers" means those special district board members who are required by law to be elected.(74)"Special election" means an election held as authorized by Section 20A-1-203.(75)"Spoiled ballot" means each ballot that:(a)is spoiled by the voter;(b)is unable to be voted because it was spoiled by the printer or a poll worker; or(c)lacks the official endorsement.(76)"Statewide special election" means a special election called by the governor or the Legislature in which all registered voters in Utah may vote.(77)"Tabulation system" means a device or system designed for the sole purpose of tabulating votes cast by voters at an election.(78)"Ticket" means  a list of:(a)political parties;(b)candidates for an office; or(c)ballot propositions.(79)"Transfer case" means the sealed box used to transport voted ballots to the counting center.(80)"Vacancy" means:(a)except as provided in Subsection (80)(b), the absence of an individual to serve in a position created by state constitution or state statute, whether that absence occurs because of death, disability, disqualification, resignation, or other cause; or(b)in relation to a candidate for a position created by state constitution or state statute, the removal of a candidate due to the candidate's death, resignation, or disqualification.(81)"Valid voter identification" means:(a)a form of identification that bears the name and photograph of the voter which may include:(i)a currently valid Utah driver license;(ii)a currently valid identification card issued under Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 8, Identification Card Act;(iii)a currently valid identification card that is issued by:(A)the state; or(B)a branch, department, or agency of the United States;(iv)a currently valid Utah permit to carry a concealed weapon;(v)a currently valid United States passport; or(vi)a currently valid United States military identification card;(b)one of the following identification cards, regardless of whether the card includes a photograph of the voter:(i)a valid tribal identification card;(ii)a Bureau of Indian Affairs card; or(iii)a tribal treaty card; or(c)two forms of identification not listed under Subsection (81)(a) or (b) but that bear the name of the voter and provide evidence that the voter resides in the voting precinct, which may include:(i)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a current utility bill, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(ii)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a bank or other financial account statement, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(iii)a certified birth certificate;(iv)a valid social security card;(v)an original or copy of a check issued by the state or the federal government, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vi)an original or copy of a paycheck from the voter's employer, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vii)a currently valid Utah hunting or fishing license;(viii)certified naturalization documentation;(ix)a currently valid license issued by an authorized agency of the United States;(x)a certified copy of court records showing the voter's adoption or name change;(xi)a valid Medicaid card, Medicare card, or Electronic Benefits Transfer Cardcard;(xii)a currently valid identification card issued by:(A)a local government within the state;(B)an employer for an employee; or(C)a college, university, technical school, or professional school located within the state; or(xiii)a current Utah vehicle registration.(82)"Valid write-in candidate" means a candidate who has qualified as a write-in candidate by following the procedures and requirements of this title.(83)"Vote by mail" means to vote, using a manual ballot that is mailed to the voter, by:(a)mailing the ballot to the location designated in the mailing; or(b)depositing the ballot in a ballot drop box designated by the election officer.(84)"Voter" means an individual who:(a)meets the requirements for voting in an election;(b)meets the requirements of election registration;(c)is registered to vote; and(d)is listed in the official register.(85)"Voter registration deadline" means the registration deadline provided in Section 20A-2-102.5.(86)"Voting area" means the area within six feet of the voting booths, voting machines, and ballot box.(87)"Voting booth" means:(a)the space or compartment within a polling place that is provided for the preparation of ballots, including the voting enclosure or curtain; or(b)a voting device that is free standing.(88)"Voting device" means any device provided by an election officer for a voter to vote a mechanical ballot.(89)"Voting precinct" means the smallest geographical voting unit, established under Chapter 5, Part 3, Duties of the County and Municipal Legislative Bodies.(90)"Watcher" means an individual who complies with the requirements described in Section 20A-3a-801 to become a watcher for an election.(91)"Write-in ballot" means a ballot containing any write-in votes.(92)"Write-in vote" means a vote cast for an individual, whose name is not printed on the ballot, in accordance with the procedures established in this title.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-7-105 is amended to read:20A-7-105. Manual petition processes -- Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Submitting the petition -- Certification of signatures -- Transfer to lieutenant governor -- Removal of signature.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process and the manual referendum process.(2)As used in this section:(a)"Local petition" means:(i)a manual local initiative petition described in Part 5, Local Initiatives - Procedures; or(ii)a manual local referendum petition described in Part 6, Local Referenda - Procedures.(b)"Packet" means an initiative packet or referendum packet.(c)"Petition" means a local petition or statewide petition.(d)"Statewide petition" means:(i)a manual statewide initiative petition described in Part 2, Statewide Initiatives; or(ii)a manual statewide referendum petition described in Part 3, Statewide Referenda.(3)(a)A Utah voter may sign a statewide petition if the voter is a legal voter.(b)A Utah voter may sign a local petition if the voter:(i)is a legal voter; and(ii)resides in the local jurisdiction.(4)(a)The sponsors shall ensure that the individual in whose presence each signature sheet was signed:(i)is at least 18 years old;(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on the last page of each packet; and(iii)is informed that each signer is required to read and understand:(A)for an initiative petition, the law proposed by the initiative; or(B)for a referendum petition, the law that the referendum seeks to overturn.(b)An individual may not sign the verification printed on the last page of a packet if the individual signed a signature sheet in the packet.(5)(a)An individual who gathers signatures under this chapter may remove a signature sheet from a packet for the purpose of gathering signatures.(b)If an individual removes a signature sheet under Subsection (5)(a), the individual shall rebind the signature sheet to the packet from which the signature sheet was removed immediately after the individual circulates the packet.(5)(6)(a)The sponsors, or an agent of the sponsors, shall submit a signed and verified packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated before 5 p.m. no later than the earlier of:(i)for a statewide initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application for the initiative petition is filed; or(C)the February 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202;(ii)for a statewide referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 40 calendar  days after the day on which the legislative session at which the law passed ends;(iii)for a local initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed;(C)the April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a county initiative; or(D)the April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a municipal initiative; or(iv)for a local referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the sponsors receive the items described in Subsection 20A-7-604(3) from the local clerk.(b)A person may not submit a packet after the applicable deadline described in Subsection (5)(a)(6)(a).(c)Before delivering an initiative packet to the county clerk under this Subsection (5)(6), the sponsors shall send an email to each individual who provides a legible, valid email address on the signature sheet that includes the following:(i)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(ii)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the initiative, the fiscal impact statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's or county clerk's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(d)For a statewide initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the county clerk, submit to the lieutenant governor:(i)a list containing:(A)the name and email address of each individual the sponsors sent, or caused to be sent, the email described in Subsection (5)(c);(6)(c); and(B)the date the email was sent;(ii)a copy of the email described in Subsection (5)(c)(6)(c); and(iii)the following written verification, completed and signed by each of the sponsors:"Verification of initiative sponsor State of Utah, County of __________I, __________, of __________, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am a sponsor of the initiative petition entitled ____________________; andI sent, or caused to be sent, to each individual who provided a legible, valid email address on a signature sheet submitted to the county clerk in relation to the initiative petition, the email described in Utah Code Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(c)20A-7-105(6)(c).______________________________________________________________ __(Name) (Residence Address)(Date).".(e)For a local initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the local clerk, submit to the local clerk the items described in Subsection (5)(d)(6)(d).(f)Signatures gathered for an initiative petition are not valid if the sponsors do not comply with Subsection (5)(c)(6)(c), (d), or (e).(6)(7)(a)Within 21 calendar days after the day on which the county clerk receives the packet, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002, or 20A-7-106 if applicable, to determine whether each signer is a legal voter and, as applicable, the jurisdiction where the signer is registered to vote;(ii)for a statewide initiative or a statewide referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter;(B)post the name, voter identification number, and date of signature of each legal voter certified under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A)(7)(a)(ii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the lieutenant governor;(iii)for a local initiative or a local referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter who is registered in the jurisdiction to which the initiative or referendum relates;(B)post the name, voter identification number, and date of signature of each legal voter certified under Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(A) (7)(a)(iii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the local clerk.(b)For a local initiative or local referendum, the local clerk shall post a link in a conspicuous location on the local government's website to the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(B)(7)(a)(iii)(B):(i)for a local initiative, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-507(3)(a); or(ii)for a local referendum, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a)(i).(7)(8)The county clerk may not certify a signature under Subsection (6)(7):(a)on a packet that is not verified in accordance with Subsection (4); or(b)that does not have a date of signature next to the signature.(8)(9)(a)A voter who signs a statewide initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk before December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2); or(ii)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk on or after December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2).(b)A voter who signs a statewide referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-307(2).(c)A voter who signs a local initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement;(ii)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-507(2);(iii)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed; or(iv)(A)for a county initiative, April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502; or(B)for a municipal initiative, April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502.(d)A voter who signs a local referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a).(e)In order for the signature to be removed, the county clerk must receive the statement described in this Subsection (8) (9) before 5 p.m. no later than the applicable deadline described in this Subsection (8)(9).(f)A county clerk shall analyze a signature, for purposes of removing a signature from a petition, in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-1003(3).(9)(10)(a)If the county clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8)(9) and determines that the signature should be removed from the petition under Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the county clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(B)(7)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii)(B); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the signature packets and signature packet totals.(b)The county clerk shall comply with Subsection (9)(a)(10)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (6)(a)(7)(a); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8)(9).(10)(11)A person may not retrieve a packet from a county clerk, or make any alterations or corrections to a packet, after the packet is submitted to the county clerk.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 20A-7-203 is amended to read:20A-7-203. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/ beginning on _________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the initiative petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.NOTICE TO SIGNERS:Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.)".(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate.".(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following statement, "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you havehad an opportunity to read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal Impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (5), the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), in not less than 12-point type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this initiative packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer hashad an opportunity to read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this initiative packet to encourage that individual to sign it.______________________________________________________________________(Name)                 (Residence Address)                                         (Date)."(5)If the initial fiscal impact statement described in Subsection (3)(f)(ii), as updated in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), exceeds 200 words, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare a shorter summary statement, for the purpose of inclusion on an initiative signature sheet, that does not exceed 200 words.(6)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 20A-7-204 is amended to read:20A-7-204. Manual initiative process -- Circulation requirements -- Lieutenant governor to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsection (3), circulate initiative packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the sponsors with a copy of the initiative petition and a signature sheet no later than the first business day that is at least three calendar days after the day on which the following conditions are fulfilled:(a)the sponsors hold the final hearing required under Section 20A-7-204.1;(b)the sponsors provide to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor the video tape, audio tape, or comprehensive minutes described in Subsection 20A-7-204.1(4) for each public hearing described in Section 20A-7-204.1;(c)(i)the sponsors give written notice to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor that the sponsors waive the opportunity to change the text of the proposed law under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5);(ii)the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(a), for changing the text of the proposed law passes without the sponsors filing an application addendum in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5); or(iii)if the sponsors file an application addendum in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst provides to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor:(A)an updated initial fiscal impact statement, in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(b); or(B)a written notice indicating that no changes to the initial fiscal impact statement are necessary;(d)(i)the sponsors give written notice to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor that the sponsors waive the opportunity to:(A)challenge the initial fiscal impact statement in court; and(B)if applicable, challenge the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court;(ii)the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-202.5(4)(a)(i), for:(A)challenging the initial fiscal impact statement in court passes without the sponsors filing a petition to challenge; and(B)if applicable, challenging the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court passes without the sponsors filing a petition to challenge; or(iii)if the sponsors timely file a petition challenging the initial fiscal impact statement in court or, if applicable, the updated initial fiscal impact statement in court, and the court's decision becomes final; and(e)the sponsors sign an agreement, under Subsection (6)(a), with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor specifying the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the initiative packets.(4)The sponsors of the initiative shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the initiative packets; and(b)ensure that the initiative packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the requirements of this part.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the initiative packets for circulation by creating multiple initiative packets.(b)TheSubject to Subsection 20A-7-105(5), the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create the initiative packets by binding a copy of the initiative petition with the text of the proposed law, including any modification made under Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5) and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the initiative packets may be conveniently opened for signing.(c)An initiative packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)contact the lieutenant governor's office to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number initiative packets;(ii)sign an agreement with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, specifying the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the initiative packets; and(iii)number each initiative packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the lieutenant governor's office, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number an initiative packet in a manner not directed by the lieutenant governor's office; or(ii)circulate or submit an initiative packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the lieutenant governor's office.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 20A-7-207 is amended to read:20A-7-207. Evaluation by the lieutenant governor.(1)In relation to the manual initiative process, when the lieutenant governor receives an initiative packet from a county clerk, the lieutenant governor shall record the number of the initiative packet received.(2)The county clerk shall:(a)in relation to the manual initiative process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-105(6)(a)(iii)20A-7-105(7)(a)(iii) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor:(A)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk before December 1, for at least 90 calendar days; or(B)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk on or after December 1, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the lieutenant governor's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update; or(b)in relation to the electronic initiative process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-217(4) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor:(A)for a signature received by the county clerk before December 1, for at least 90 calendar days; or(B)for a signature received by the county clerk on or after December 1, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the lieutenant governor's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update.(3)The lieutenant governor:(a)shall, except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), declare the initiative petition to be sufficient or insufficient on April 30 before the regular general election described in Subsection 20A-7-201(2)(b); or(b)may declare the initiative petition to be insufficient before the day described in Subsection (3)(a) if:(i)in relation to the manual initiative process, the total of all valid signatures on timely and lawfully submitted initiative packets that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of signatures on timely and lawfully submitted initiative packets that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-201;(ii)in relation to the electronic initiative process, the total of all timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures received under Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(b) that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-201; or(iii)a requirement of this part has not been met.(4)(a)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) equals or exceeds the number of names required under Section 20A-7-201, and the requirements of this part are met, the lieutenant governor shall mark upon the front of the initiative petition the word "sufficient."(b)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) does not equal or exceed the number of names required under Section 20A-7-201 or a requirement of this part is not met, the lieutenant governor shall mark upon the front of the initiative petition the word "insufficient."(c)The lieutenant governor shall immediately notify any one of the sponsors of the lieutenant governor's finding.(5)After an initiative petition is declared insufficient, a person may not submit additional signatures to qualify the initiative for the ballot.(6)(a)If the lieutenant governor refuses to declare an initiative petition sufficient that a voter believes is legally sufficient, the voter may, no later than May 15, apply to the appropriate court for an order finding the initiative petition legally sufficient.(b)If the court determines that the initiative petition is legally sufficient, the lieutenant governor shall mark the petition "sufficient" and consider the declaration of sufficiency effective as of the date on which the initiative petition should have been declared sufficient by the lieutenant governor's office.(c)If the court determines that the initiative petition is not legally sufficient, the court may enjoin the lieutenant governor and all other officers from certifying or printing the ballot title and numbers of that measure on the official ballot.(7)An initiative petition determined to be sufficient in accordance with this section is qualified for the ballot.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 20A-7-303 is amended to read:20A-7-303. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that Senate (or House) Bill No.  ____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election;Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the referendum petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this referendum packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.".(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you havehad an opportunity to read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this referendum packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer hashad an opportunity to read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it.________________________________________________________________________(Name)                       (Residence Address)                                  (Date).".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 20A-7-304 is amended to read:20A-7-304. Manual referendum process -- Circulation requirements -- Lieutenant governor to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsection (3), circulate referendum packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(3)The lieutenant governor shall provide the sponsors with a copy of the referendum petition and a signature sheet no later than the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the sponsors sign an agreement, under Subsection (6)(a), with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor specifying the range of numbers that the sponsors will use to number the referendum packets.(4)The sponsors of the referendum petition shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the referendum packets; and(b)ensure that the referendum packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the form requirements of this section.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the referendum packets for circulation by creating multiple referendum packets.(b)TheSubject to Subsection 20A-7-105(5), the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by binding a copy of the referendum petition with the text of the law that is the subject of the referendum and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the referendum packets may be conveniently opened for signing.(c)A referendum packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)contact the lieutenant governor's office to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number referendum packets;(ii)sign an agreement with the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, specifying the range of numbers that the sponsor will use to number the referendum packets; and(iii)number each referendum packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the lieutenant governor's office, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number a referendum packet in a manner not directed by the lieutenant governor's office; or(ii)circulate or submit a referendum packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the lieutenant governor's office.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 20A-7-307 is amended to read:20A-7-307. Evaluation by the lieutenant governor.(1)In relation to the manual referendum process, when the lieutenant governor receives a referendum packet from a county clerk, the lieutenant governor shall record the number of the referendum packet received.(2)The county clerk shall:(a)in relation to the manual referendum process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-105(6)(a)(iii)20A-7-105(7)(a)(iii) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the lieutenant governor's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update; or(b)in relation to the electronic referendum process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-315(4) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the lieutenant governor's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update.(3)The lieutenant governor:(a)shall, except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), declare the referendum petition to be sufficient or insufficient 106 calendar days after the end of the legislative session at which the law passed; or(b)may declare the referendum petition to be insufficient before the day described in Subsection (3)(a) if:(i)in relation to the manual referendum process, the total of all valid signatures on timely and lawfully submitted referendum packets that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of signatures on timely and lawfully submitted referendum packets that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-301;(ii)in relation to the electronic referendum process, the total of all timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures received under Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(b) that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-301; or(iii)a requirement of this part has not been met.(4)(a)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) equals or exceeds the number of names required under Section 20A-7-301, and the requirements of this part are met, the lieutenant governor shall mark upon the front of the referendum petition the word "sufficient."(b)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) does not equal or exceed the number of names required under Section 20A-7-301 or a requirement of this part is not met, the lieutenant governor shall mark upon the front of the referendum petition the word "insufficient."(c)The lieutenant governor shall immediately notify any one of the sponsors of the lieutenant governor's finding.(d)After a referendum petition is declared insufficient, a person may not submit additional signatures to qualify the referendum for the ballot.(5)(a)If the lieutenant governor refuses to declare a referendum petition sufficient that a voter believes is legally sufficient, the voter may, no later than 10 days after the day on which the lieutenant governor declares the petition insufficient, apply to the appropriate court for an order finding the referendum petition legally sufficient.(b)If the court determines that the referendum petition is legally sufficient, the lieutenant governor shall mark the referendum petition "sufficient" and consider the declaration of sufficiency effective as of the date on which the referendum petition should have been declared sufficient by the lieutenant governor's office.(c)If the court determines that a referendum petition filed is not legally sufficient, the court may enjoin the lieutenant governor and all other officers from certifying or printing the ballot title and numbers of that measure on the official ballot.(6)A referendum petition determined to be sufficient in accordance with this section is qualified for the ballot.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 20A-7-503 is amended to read:20A-7-503. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it.Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you havehad an opportunity to read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal and legal impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)the summary statement in the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3), in not less than 12-point, bold type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer hashad an opportunity to read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.______________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date).".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 20A-7-504 is amended to read:20A-7-504. Manual initiative process -- Circulation requirements -- Local clerk to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsections (3) and 20A-7-401.5(4)(b), circulate initiative packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(3)Within five calendar days after the day on which a county, city, town, or court determines, in accordance with Section 20A-7-502.7, that a law proposed in an initiative petition is legally referable to voters, the local clerk shall provide to the sponsors:(a)a copy of the initiative petition;(b)a signature sheet; and(c)a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(4)The sponsors of the initiative shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the initiative packets; and(b)ensure that the initiative packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the requirements of this part.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the initiative packets for circulation by creating multiple initiative packets.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create initiative packets by binding a copy of the initiative petition with the text of the proposed law and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the initiative packets may be conveniently opened for signing.(c)An initiative packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(d)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall include, with each initiative packet, a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(6)(a)TheSubject to Subsection 20A-7-105(5), the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)contact the county clerk to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number initiative packets; and(ii)number each initiative packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the county clerk, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number an initiative packet in a manner not directed by the county clerk; or(ii)circulate or submit an initiative packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the county clerk.(c)The county clerk shall keep a record of the number range provided under Subsection (6)(a).

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 20A-7-507 is amended to read:20A-7-507. Evaluation by the local clerk.(1)In relation to the manual initiative process, when a local clerk receives an initiative packet from a county clerk, the local clerk shall record the number of the initiative packet received.(2)The county clerk shall:(a)in relation to the manual initiative process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-105(6)(a)(iii)20A-7-105(7)(a)(iii) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 90 calendar days; and(ii)update on the local government's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update; or(b)in relation to the electronic initiative process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-516(4) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 90 calendar days; and(ii)update on the local government's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update.(3)The local clerk:(a)shall, except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), declare the initiative petition to be sufficient or insufficient:(i)in relation to the manual initiative process, no later than 21 calendar days after the day of the applicable deadline described in Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(a)(iii)20A-7-105(6)(a)(iii); or(ii)in relation to the electronic initiative process, no later than 21 calendar days after the day of the applicable deadline described in Subsection 20A-7-516(2); or(b)may declare the initiative petition to be insufficient before the day described in Subsection (3)(a) if:(i)in relation to the manual initiative process, the total of all valid signatures on timely and lawfully submitted initiative packets that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of signatures on timely and lawfully submitted initiative packets that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-501;(ii)in relation to the electronic initiative process, the total of all timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures received under Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(b) that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-501; or(iii)a requirement of this part has not been met.(4)(a)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) equals or exceeds the number of names required by Section 20A-7-501 and the requirements of this part are met, the local clerk shall mark upon the front of the initiative petition the word "sufficient."(b)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) does not equal or exceed the number of names required by Section 20A-7-501 or a requirement of this part is not met, the local clerk shall mark upon the front of the initiative petition the word "insufficient."(c)The local clerk shall immediately notify any one of the sponsors of the local clerk's finding.(d)After an initiative petition is declared insufficient, a person may not submit additional signatures to qualify the initiative for the ballot.(5)If the local clerk finds the total number of certified signatures for the initiative petition to be insufficient, any sponsor may file a written demand with the local clerk for a recount of the signatures collected for the initiative petition in the presence of any sponsor.(6)An initiative petition determined to be sufficient in accordance with this section is qualified for the ballot.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 20A-7-603 is amended to read:20A-7-603. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally had an opportunity to read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths.75 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words, "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you havehad an opportunity to read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet or the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer hashad an opportunity to read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.________________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 20A-7-604 is amended to read:20A-7-604. Manual referendum process -- Circulation requirements -- Local clerk to provide sponsors with materials.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, after the sponsors receive the documents described in Subsections (3) and 20A-7-401.5(4)(b), circulate referendum packets that meet the form requirements of this part.(3)Within five calendar days after the day on which a county, city, town, or court determines, in accordance with Section 20A-7-602.7, that a proposed referendum is legally referable to voters, the local clerk shall provide the sponsors with:(a)a copy of the referendum petition;(b)a signature sheet; and(c)a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(4)The sponsors of the referendum petition shall:(a)arrange and pay for the printing of all documents that are part of the referendum packets; and(b)ensure that the referendum packets and the documents described in Subsection (4)(a) meet the form requirements of this section.(5)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may prepare the referendum packets for circulation by creating multiple referendum packets.(b)TheSubject to Subsection 20A-7-105(5), the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall create referendum packets by binding a copy of the referendum petition with the text of the law that is the subject of the referendum and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in a manner that the referendum packets may be conveniently opened for signing.(c)A referendum packet is not required to have a uniform number of signature sheets.(d)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall include, with each packet, a copy of the proposition information pamphlet provided to the sponsors under Subsection 20A-7-401.5(4)(b).(6)(a)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall, before gathering signatures:(i)contact the county clerk to receive a range of numbers that the sponsors may use to number referendum packets;(ii)sign an agreement with the local clerk, specifying the range of numbers that the sponsor will use to number the referendum packets; and(iii)number each referendum packet, sequentially, within the range of numbers provided by the county clerk, starting with the lowest number in the range.(b)The sponsors or an agent of the sponsors may not:(i)number a referendum packet in a manner not directed by the county clerk; or(ii)circulate or submit a referendum packet that is not numbered in the manner directed by the county clerk.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 20A-7-607 is amended to read:20A-7-607. Evaluation by the local clerk -- Determination of election for vote on referendum.(1)In relation to the manual referendum process, when the local clerk receives a referendum packet from a county clerk, the local clerk shall record the number of the referendum packet received.(2)The county clerk shall:(a)in relation to the manual referendum process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-105(6)(a)(iii)20A-7-105(7)(a)(iii) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the local clerk's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update; or(b)in relation to the electronic referendum process:(i)post the names, voter identification numbers, and dates of signatures described in Subsection 20A-7-616(3) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 45 calendar days; and(ii)update on the lieutenant governor's website the number of signatures certified as of the date of the update.(3)The local clerk:(a)shall, except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), declare the referendum petition to be sufficient or insufficient:(i)in relation to the manual referendum process, no later than 111 calendar days after the day of the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(a)(iv)20A-7-105(6)(a)(iv), to submit a referendum packet to the county clerk; or(ii)in relation to the electronic referendum process, no later than 111 calendar days after the day of the deadline, described in Subsection 20A-7-616(2), to collect a signature; or(b)may declare the referendum petition to be insufficient before the day described in Subsection (3)(a) if:(i)in relation to the manual referendum process, the total of all valid signatures on timely and lawfully submitted referendum packets that have been certified by the county clerk, plus the number of signatures on timely and lawfully submitted referendum packets that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-601;(ii)in relation to the electronic referendum process, the total of all timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures that have been certified by the county clerks, plus the number of timely and lawfully submitted valid signatures received under Subsection 20A-21-201(6)(b) that have not yet been evaluated for certification, is less than the number of names required under Section 20A-7-601; or(iii)a requirement of this part has not been met.(4)(a)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) equals or exceeds the number of names required under Section 20A-7-601, and the requirements of this part are met, the local clerk shall mark upon the front of the referendum petition the word "sufficient."(b)If the total number of names certified under Subsection (3) does not equal or exceed the number of names required under Section 20A-7-601 or a requirement of this part is not met, the local clerk shall mark upon the front of the referendum petition the word "insufficient."(c)The local clerk shall immediately notify any one of the sponsors of the local clerk's finding.(d)After a referendum petition is declared insufficient, a person may not submit additional signatures to qualify the referendum for the ballot.(5)(a)If the local clerk refuses to declare a referendum petition sufficient, any voter may, no later than 10 days after the day on which the local clerk declares the referendum petition insufficient, apply to the appropriate court for an order finding the referendum petition legally sufficient.(b)If the court determines that the referendum petition is legally sufficient, the local clerk shall mark the referendum petition "sufficient" and consider the declaration of sufficiency effective as of the date on which the referendum petition should have been declared sufficient by the local clerk's office.(c)If the court determines that a referendum petition filed is not legally sufficient, the court may enjoin the local clerk and all other officers from:(i)certifying or printing the ballot title and numbers of that referendum on the official ballot for the next election; or(ii)as it relates to a local tax law that is conducted entirely by mail, certifying, printing, or mailing the ballot title and numbers of that referendum under Section 20A-7-609.5.(6)A referendum petition determined to be sufficient in accordance with this section is qualified for the ballot.(7)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (7)(b) or (c), if a referendum relates to legislative action taken after April 15, the election officer may not place the referendum on an election ballot until a primary election, a general election, or a special election the following year.(b)The election officer may place a referendum described in Subsection (7)(a) on the ballot for a special, primary, or general election held during the year that the legislative action was taken if the following agree, in writing, on a timeline to place the referendum on that ballot:(i)the local clerk;(ii)the county clerk; and(iii)the attorney for the county or municipality that took the legislative action.(c)For a referendum on a land use law, if, before August 30, the local clerk or a court determines that the total number of certified names equals or exceeds the number of signatures required in Section 20A-7-601, the election officer shall place the referendum on the election ballot for:(i)the next general election; or(ii)another election, if the following agree, in writing, on a timeline to place the referendum on that ballot:(A)the affected owners, as defined in Section 10-20-102 or 17-79-102, as applicable;(B)the local clerk;(C)the county clerk; and(D)the attorney for the county or municipality that took the legislative action.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 20A-7-613 is amended to read:20A-7-613. Property tax referendum petition.(1)As used in this section, "certified tax rate" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-2-924.(2)Except as provided in this section, the requirements of this part apply to a referendum petition challenging a taxing entity's legislative body's vote to impose a tax rate that exceeds the certified tax rate.(3)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(a)(iv)20A-7-105(6)(a)(iv), and subject to Subsection (3)(b), the sponsors or an agent of the sponsors shall deliver a signed and verified referendum packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated before 5 p.m. no later than the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the packet; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 40 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk complies with Subsection 20A-7-604(3).(b)For a county where the county clerk's office is closed on a business day, if the deadline described in Subsection (3)(a) is on that business day, the deadline is extended until 5 p.m. the next day that the office is open.(4)Notwithstanding Subsections 20A-7-105(6)(a) and (9)20A-7-105(7)(a) and (10), the county clerk shall take the actions required in Subsections 20A-7-105(6)(a) and (9)20A-7-105(7)(a) and (10) within 10 business days after the day on which the county clerk receives the signed and verified referendum packet as described in Subsection (3).(5)The local clerk shall take the actions required by Section 20A-7-607 within two business days after:(a)in relation to the manual referendum process, the day on which the local clerk receives the referendum packets from the county clerk; or(b)in relation to the electronic referendum process, the deadline described in Subsection 20A-7-616(2).(6)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-7-608(2), the local attorney shall prepare the ballot title within two business days after the day on which the referendum petition is declared sufficient for submission to a vote of the people.(7)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-7-609(2)(c), a referendum that qualifies for the ballot under this section shall appear on the ballot for the earlier of the next regular general election or the next municipal general election unless a special election is called.(8)The election officer shall mail manual ballots on a referendum under this section the later of:(a)the time provided in Section 20A-3a-202 or 20A-16-403; or(b)the time that ballots are prepared for mailing under this section.(9)Section 20A-7-402 does not apply to a referendum described in this section.(10)(a)If a majority of voters does not vote against imposing the tax at a rate calculated to generate the increased revenue budgeted, adopted, and approved by the taxing entity's legislative body:(i)the certified tax rate for the fiscal year during which the referendum petition is filed is its most recent certified tax rate; and(ii)the proposed increased revenues for purposes of establishing the certified tax rate for the fiscal year after the fiscal year described in Subsection (10)(a)(i) are the proposed increased revenues budgeted, adopted, and approved by the taxing entity's legislative body before the filing of the referendum petition.(b)If a majority of voters votes against imposing a tax at the rate established by the vote of the taxing entity's legislative body, the certified tax rate for the taxing entity is the taxing entity's most recent certified tax rate.(c)If the tax rate is set in accordance with Subsection (10)(a)(ii), a taxing entity is not required to comply with the notice and public hearing requirements of Section 59-2-919 if the taxing entity complies with those notice and public hearing requirements before the referendum petition is filed.(11)The ballot title shall, at a minimum, include in substantially this form the following: "Shall the [name of the taxing entity] be authorized to levy a tax rate in the amount sufficient to generate an increased property tax revenue of [amount] for fiscal year [year] as budgeted, adopted, and approved by the [name of the taxing entity].".(12)A taxing entity shall pay the county the costs incurred by the county that are directly related to meeting the requirements of this section and that the county would not have incurred but for compliance with this section.(13)(a)An election officer shall include on a ballot a referendum that has not yet qualified for placement on the ballot, if:(i)sponsors file an application for a referendum described in this section;(ii)the ballot will be used for the election for which the sponsors are attempting to qualify the referendum; and(iii)the deadline for qualifying the referendum for placement on the ballot occurs after the day on which the ballot will be printed.(b)If an election officer includes on a ballot a referendum described in Subsection (13)(a), the ballot title shall comply with Subsection (11).(c)If an election officer includes on a ballot a referendum described in Subsection (13)(a) that does not qualify for placement on the ballot, the election officer shall inform the voters by any practicable method that the referendum has not qualified for the ballot and that votes cast in relation to the referendum will not be counted.

Section 16:
Section 16.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.